Hawaii statutes.
§392-47 Failure to give security for payment of benefits;
penalty; injunction. If an employer fails to comply with section 392-41 the
employer shall be subject to a penalty of not less than $500 or of $100 for
each employee for every day during which such failure continues, whichever sum
is greater, to be recovered in an action brought in the discretion of the
director and the amount so collected shall be paid into the trust fund for
disability benefits created by section 392-61. The director may, however, in
the director's discretion, for good cause shown, remit all or any part of the
penalty in excess of $500; provided that the employer in default complies with
section 392-41.

Furthermore, if any
employer is in default under section 392-41, for a period of thirty days, the
employer may be enjoined by the circuit court of the circuit in which the
employer's principal place of business is located from carrying on the
employer's business any place in the State so long as the default continues,
such action for injunction to be prosecuted by the attorney general or any
county attorney if so requested by the director. [L 1969, c 148, pt of
§1; am L 1971, c 109, §1(i); gen ch 1985; am L 2013, c 100, §8; am L 2016, c
187, §7]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next